Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions
31-2A-14.
Georgia Diabetes Control Grant Program; advisory committee; administration of authorized grant programs; grant criteria.

There is established within the Department of Public Health the Georgia Diabetes Control Grant Program. The purpose of the grant program shall be to develop, implement, and promote a state-wide effort to combat the proliferation of Type 2 diabetes and pre-diabetes.

The program shall be under the direction of a seven-member advisory committee, appointed by the Governor. The Governor, in making such appointments, shall ensure to the greatest extent possible that the membership of the advisory committee is representative of this state’s geographic and demographic composition, with appropriate attention to the representation of women, minorities, and rural Georgia. The appointments made by the Governor shall include one member who is:

A physician licensed in this state;

A registered nurse licensed in this state;

A dietitian licensed in this state;

A diabetes educator;

A representative of the business community;

A pharmacist licensed in this state; and

A consumer who has diabetes.

The commissioner, or his or her designee, shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the advisory committee. Appointed advisory committee members shall be named for five-year terms staggered so that one term will expire each year, except for the fourth and fifth year, when two terms will expire. Their successors shall be named for five-year terms.

The Georgia Diabetes Control Grant Program shall be authorized to administer two grant programs targeted at new, expanded, or innovative approaches to address diabetes as follows:

A program to provide grants to middle schools and high schools to promote the understanding and prevention of diabetes may be established by the program. Such grants shall be provided through the appropriate local board of education. Grant requests shall contain specific information regarding requirements as to how the grant should be spent and how such spending promotes the understanding and prevention of diabetes. Grant recipients shall be required to provide the advisory committee with quarterly reports of the results of the grant program; and

A program to provide grants to health care providers for support of evidence based diabetes programs for education, screening, disease management, and self-management targeting populations at greatest risk for pre-diabetes, diabetes, and the complications of diabetes; and grants may also be awarded to address evidence based activities that focus on policy, systems, and environmental changes that support prevention, early detection, and treatment of diabetes. Eligible entities shall include community and faith based clinics and other organizations, federally qualified health centers, regional and county health departments, hospitals, and other public entities, and other health related service providers which are qualified as exempt from taxation under the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. Such entities shall have been in existence for at least three years, demonstrate financial stability, utilize evidence based practices, and show measurable results in their programs.

The advisory committee shall work with the department to establish grant criteria and make award decisions, with the goal of creating a state-wide set of resources to assist residents of Georgia in their efforts to prevent or treat diabetes. Grants shall not be used for funding existing programs.

The grant program shall be under the direction of the diabetes coordinator appointed pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-13. The department shall provide sufficient staff, administrative support, and such other resources as may be necessary for the diabetes coordinator to carry out the duties required by this Code section.

This Code section shall be subject to appropriation from the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-17.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 548, § 1-3/SB 435; Code 1981, §

31-2A-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31/HB 142.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “dietitian” was substituted for “dietician” in paragraph (b)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 548, § 1-1/SB 435, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Diabetes is a chronic disease caused by the inability of the pancreas to produce insulin or to use the insulin produced in the proper way;

“(2) If untreated and poorly managed, diabetes has been medically proven to lead to blindness, kidney failure, amputation, heart attack, and stroke;

“(3) Diabetes is the sixth leading cause of death in the United States, responsible for a similar number of deaths each year as HIV/AIDS;

“(4) In Georgia, the prevalence of diabetes is 8 percent higher than the nation as a whole;

“(5) One out of three people with diabetes are not aware that they have the disease;

“(6) Without aggressive societal action, the number of people living with diabetes in Georgia will more than double to 1,697,000 people in the next 20 years, cutting life short for these people by ten to 20 years; and

“(7) Without aggressive societal action, the economic burden of diabetes on the State of Georgia is expected to grow from $5 billion each year to about $11.9 billion in the next 20 years.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 548, § 1-2/SB 435, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Diabetes and Health Improvement Act of 2010.’ ”

Pursuant to the terms of subsection (f), funds were not appropriated at the 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, or 2022 sessions of the General Assembly.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 54(e)/HB 142, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2011 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subsection (b) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31(2)/HB 142, was not given effect.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2A-15.
Additional duties of commissioner; authority to convene expert panels and consult with experts.

In addition to other authority and duties granted in this title, the commissioner shall:

Provide a written report of expenditures made for public health purposes in the prior fiscal year to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Lieutenant Governor no later than December 1 of each year beginning December 1, 2010; and

Serve as the chief liaison to county boards of health through their directors on matters related to the operations and programmatic responsibilities of such county boards of health; provided, however, the commissioner may designate a person from within the department to serve as such chief liaison.

The commissioner shall be authorized to convene one or more panels of experts to address various public health issues and may consult with experts on epidemiological and emergency preparedness issues.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2A-16.
Maternal Mortality Review Committee established.

The General Assembly finds that:

Georgia currently ranks fiftieth in maternal deaths in the United States;

Maternal deaths are a serious public health concern and have a tremendous family and societal impact;

Maternal deaths are significantly underestimated and inadequately documented, preventing efforts to identify and reduce or eliminate the causes of death;

No processes exist in this state for the confidential identification, investigation, or dissemination of findings regarding maternal deaths;

The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has determined that maternal deaths should be investigated through state based maternal mortality reviews in order to institute the systemic changes needed to decrease maternal mortality; and

There is a need to establish a program to review maternal deaths and to develop strategies for the prevention of maternal deaths in Georgia.

The Department of Public Health shall establish a Maternal Mortality Review Committee to review maternal deaths and to develop strategies for the prevention of maternal deaths. The committee shall be multidisciplinary and composed of members as deemed appropriate by the department. The department may contract with an external organization to assist in collecting, analyzing, and disseminating maternal mortality information, organizing and convening meetings of the committee, and other tasks as may be incident to these activities, including providing the necessary data, information, and resources to ensure successful completion of the ongoing review required by this Code section.

The committee shall:

Identify maternal death cases;

Review medical records and other relevant data;

Contact family members and other affected or involved persons to collect additional relevant data;

Consult with relevant experts to evaluate the records and data;

Make determinations regarding the preventability of maternal deaths;

Develop recommendations for the prevention of maternal deaths; and

Disseminate findings and recommendations to policy makers, health care providers, health care facilities, and the general public.

Health care providers licensed pursuant to Title 43, health care facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 31, and pharmacies licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title 26 shall provide reasonable access to the committee to all relevant medical records associated with a case under review by the committee within 30 days of receiving a request for such records.

A health care provider, health care facility, or pharmacy providing access to medical records pursuant to this Code section shall not be held liable for civil damages or be subject to any criminal or disciplinary action for good faith efforts in providing such records.

Information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data collected pursuant to this Code section shall not be admissible as evidence in any action of any kind in any court or before any other tribunal, board, agency, or person. Such information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data shall not be exhibited nor their contents disclosed in any way, in whole or in part, by any officer or representative of the department or any other person, except as may be necessary for the purpose of furthering the review of the committee of the case to which they relate. No person participating in such review shall disclose, in any manner, the information so obtained except in strict conformity with such review project.

All information, records of interviews, written reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data obtained by the department, the committee, and other persons, agencies, or organizations so authorized by the department pursuant to this Code section shall be confidential.

All proceedings and activities of the committee under this Code section, opinions of members of such committee formed as a result of such proceedings and activities, and records obtained, created, or maintained pursuant to this Code section, including records of interviews, written reports, and statements procured by the department or any other person, agency, or organization acting jointly or under contract with the department in connection with the requirements of this Code section, shall be confidential and shall not be subject to Chapter 14 of Title 50, relating to open meetings, or Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records, or subject to subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit or restrict the right to discover or use in any civil or criminal proceeding anything that is available from another source and entirely independent of the committee’s proceedings.

Members of the committee shall not be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding the information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a meeting or communication of the committee; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prevent a member of the committee from testifying to information obtained independently of the committee or which is public information.

Reports of aggregated nonindividually identifiable data shall be compiled on a routine basis for distribution in an effort to further study the causes and problems associated with maternal deaths. A detailed annual report shall be submitted no later than October 1 to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 337, § 1/SB 273; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-6/HB 186; Ga. L. 2021, p. 419, § 1/HB 567.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of the second sentence of subsection (g) for the former provisions, which read: “Reports shall be distributed to the General Assembly, health care providers and facilities, key government agencies, and others necessary to reduce the maternal death rate”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added “within 30 days of receiving a request for such records” at the end of paragraph (d)(1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, Code Section 31-2A-16, as enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 822, § 1/HB 966, was redesignated as Code Section 31-2A-17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

31-2A-17.
Alzheimer’s Disease Registry established; purpose; procedures; rules and regulations; confidentiality of data.

There is established within the Department of Public Health the Alzheimer’s Disease Registry.

The purpose of the registry shall be to assist in the development of public policy and planning relative to Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders. The registry shall provide a central data base of individuals with Alzheimer’s disease or related disorders.

The department shall establish procedures and promulgate rules and regulations for the establishment and operation of the registry. Such procedures, rules, and regulations shall provide for:

Collecting and evaluating data regarding the prevalence of Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders in Georgia, including who shall report the data to the registry;

Determining what information shall be maintained in the registry and the length of time such data shall be available;

Sharing of data for policy planning purposes;

Disclosing nonidentifying data to support Alzheimer’s and related disorder research;

The methodology by which families and physicians of persons who are reported to the registry shall be contacted to gather additional data; and

Information about public and private resources.

The collected data in the registry shall be confidential, and all persons to whom the data is released shall maintain patient confidentiality. No publication of information, biotechnical research, or medical data shall be made that identifies any patient by name. The registry shall be established and regulated pursuant to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Section 1301, et seq., and P.L. 104-191, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 822, § 1/HB 966.

Cross references.

Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan, T. 49, C. 6, Art. 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, Code Section 31-2A-16, as enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 822, § 1/HB 966, was redesignated as Code Section 31-2A-17.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2014).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

31-2A-18.
Establishment of the Low THC Oil Patient Registry; definitions; purpose; registration cards; semiannual reports; waiver forms; annual review and recommendations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Board” means the Georgia Composite Medical Board.

“Caregiver” means the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of an individual who is less than 18 years of age or the legal guardian of an adult.

“Condition” means:

Cancer, when such disease is diagnosed as end stage or the treatment produces related wasting illness or recalcitrant nausea and vomiting;

Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Seizure disorders related to a diagnosis of epilepsy or trauma related head injuries;

Multiple sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Crohn’s disease;

Mitochondrial disease;

Parkinson’s disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Sickle cell disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Tourette’s syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as severe;

Autism spectrum disorder, when such disorder is diagnosed for a patient who is at least 18 years of age, or severe autism, when diagnosed for a patient who is less than 18 years of age;

Epidermolysis bullosa;

Alzheimer’s disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Acquired immune deficiency syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Peripheral neuropathy, when such symptoms are diagnosed as severe or end stage;

Post-traumatic stress disorder resulting from direct exposure to or the witnessing of a trauma for a patient who is at least 18 years of age; or

Intractable pain.

“Department” means the Department of Public Health.

“Intractable pain” means pain that has a cause that cannot be removed and for which, according to generally accepted medical practice, the full range of pain management modalities appropriate for the patient has been used for a period of at least six months without adequate results or with intolerable side effects.

“Low THC oil” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-190.

“Physician” means an individual licensed to practice medicine pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Registry” means the Low THC Oil Patient Registry.

There is established within the department the Low THC Oil Patient Registry.

The purpose of the registry is to provide a registration of individuals and caregivers who have been issued registration cards. The department shall establish procedures and promulgate rules and regulations for the establishment and operation of the registration process and dispensing of registry cards to individuals and caregivers.

The department shall issue a registration card to individuals who have been certified to the department by his or her physician as being diagnosed with a condition or is an inpatient or outpatient in a hospice program and have been authorized by such physician to use low THC oil as treatment. The department shall issue a registration card to a caregiver when the circumstances warrant the issuance of such card. The board shall establish procedures and promulgate rules and regulations to assist physicians in providing required uniform information relating to certification and any other matter relating to the issuance of certifications. In promulgating such rules and regulations, the board shall require that physicians have a doctor-patient relationship when certifying an individual as needing low THC oil and physicians shall be required to be treating such individual for the specific condition requiring such treatment or be treating such individual in a hospice program. A physician shall seek and review information about a patient from the prescription drug monitoring program data base established pursuant to Code Section 16-13-57 prior to certifying such patient to the department as being diagnosed with a specific condition that requires the use of low THC oil as treatment.

The board shall require physicians to issue semiannual reports to the board. Such reports shall require physicians to provide information, including, but not limited to, dosages recommended for a particular condition, patient clinical responses, levels of tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinolic acid present in test results, compliance, responses to treatment, side effects, and drug interactions. Such reports shall be used for research purposes to determine the efficacy of the use of low THC oil as a treatment for conditions.

Information received and records kept by the department for purposes of administering this Code section shall be confidential; provided, however, that such information shall be disclosed, subject to the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and any regulations promulgated thereunder:

Upon written request of an individual or caregiver registered pursuant to this Code section for information related to the individual or his or her caregiver;

To peace officers and prosecuting attorneys for the purpose of:

Verifying that an individual in possession of a registration card is registered pursuant to this Code section; or

Determining that an individual in possession of low THC oil is registered pursuant to this Code section; and

To government entities and other entities for statistical, research, educational, instructional, drug abuse prevention, or grant application purposes after removing all personal identifiers from the health information and removing all information that could be used to identify prescribers.

The board shall develop a waiver form that will advise that the use of cannabinoids and THC containing products have not been approved by the FDA and the clinical benefits are unknown and may cause harm. Any patient or caregiver shall sign such waiver prior to his or her approval for registration.

The board, in coordination with the Department of Public Health, shall annually review the conditions included in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section and recommend additional conditions that have been shown through medical research to be effectively treated with low THC oil. Such recommendations shall include recommended dosages for a particular condition, patient responses to treatment with respect to the particular condition, and drug interactions with other drugs commonly taken by patients with the particular condition. Such recommendations shall be made jointly by the board and the Department of Public Health to the General Assembly no later than December 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 2-1/HB 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 611, § 2/SB 16; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323; Ga. L. 2018, p. 148, § 2/HB 65; Ga. L. 2019, p. 43, § 6/HB 324; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 2A/SB 46.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “disease is diagnosed as” for “diagnosis is” throughout paragraph (a)(3); substituted “illness or” for “illness,” in subparagraph (a)(3)(A); inserted “a” in subparagraph (a)(3)(C); deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(G); substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(H); added subparagraphs (a)(3)(I) through (a)(3)(N); deleted the former third and fourth sentences in subsection (c), which read: “Only individuals residing in this state for at least one year or a child born in this state less than one year old shall be eligible for registration under this Code section. Nothing in this Code section shall apply to any Georgia residents living temporarily in another state for the purpose of securing THC oil for treatment of any condition under this Code section.”; in subsection (d), in the first sentence, substituted “individuals who have” for “individuals and caregivers as soon as practicable but no later than September 1, 2015, when an individual has” near the beginning, inserted “or is an inpatient or outpatient in a hospice program”, substituted “have been authorized” for “has been authorized” near the middle, and deleted “for such condition” following “as treatment” at the end, added the second sentence, and, in the fourth sentence, substituted “treating such individual” for “treating an individual” near the middle, and added “or be treating such individual in a hospice program” at the end; in subsection (e), substituted “semiannual” for “quarterly” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “patient” and inserted “levels of tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinolic acid present in test results,”. The second 2017 amendment, effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subparagraph (a)(3)(A).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (a), deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(M), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(N), added subparagraphs (a)(3)(O) and (a)(3)(P), added paragraph (a)(5), redesignated former paragraphs (a)(5) through (a)(7) as present paragraphs (a)(6) through (a)(8), respectively; and added subsection (h).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added the last sentence in subsection (d); added the last sentence in subsection (e); and, in subsection (h), inserted “, in coordination with the Department of Public Health,” near the beginning of the first sentence and inserted “jointly by the board and the Department of Public Health” in the middle of the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, added “, subject to the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and any regulations promulgated thereunder” at the end of subsection (f); substituted “section for information related to the individual or his or her caregiver;” for “section; and” at the end of paragraph (f)(1); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (f)(2)(B); and added paragraph (f)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, a comma was deleted following “nausea” in subparagraph (a)(3)(A).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 1-1/HB 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Haleigh’s Hope Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 43, § 1/HB 324, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Georgia’s Hope Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 43, § 2/HB 324, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) The General Assembly finds that the establishment of the Low THC Oil Patient Registry in 2015 allows Georgia patients to possess low THC oil but provides no way to access low THC oil. The General Assembly finds that thousands of Georgians have serious medical conditions that can be improved by the medically approved use of cannabis and that the law should not stand between them and treatment necessary for life and health. The General Assembly finds that the purpose of this Act is to allow the legitimate use of medical cannabis for health care, including palliative care. The General Assembly finds that this Act does not in any way diminish this state’s strong public policy and laws against illegal drug use, nor should it be deemed in any manner to advocate, authorize, promote, or legally or socially accept the use of marijuana for children or adults for any nonmedical use.

“(b) The General Assembly further finds that:

“(1)
Low THC oil can offer significant medical benefits to patients;

“(2)
Low THC oil can only be derived from the cannabis plant;

“(3)
A carefully constructed system of in-state cultivation to benefit only those patients authorized by Georgia law and approved by their physician would benefit patients within the State of Georgia;

“(4)
The State of Georgia is deeply opposed to any recreational or nonmedical use of marijuana, and any system to help patients access low THC oil should be as limited in scope as possible;

“(5)
Business opportunities resulting from a system of in-state cultivation should be inclusive of minority, women, and veteran owned businesses;

“(6)
Businesses resulting from this Act should include at least 20 percent participation by minority, women, and veteran owned businesses as licensees, suppliers, and partners of businesses licensed under this Act; and

“(7)
The State of Georgia should encourage active participation by minority, women, and veteran owned businesses, as well as take any steps necessary to ensure there is no discrimination in the issuance of licenses or participation in business activities resulting from this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 153 (2015).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 39 (2019).

31-2A-19.
[Reserved] Creation of Joint Study Commission on Low THC Medical Oil Access; membership; operation; reporting; abolishment.

History.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 148, § 1/HB 65; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 148, § 1/HB 65, effective December 31, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 148, § 1/HB 65 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective December 31, 2018.